Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Requirement of Sewer Connection

7-35-201. Owners required to connect to municipal sewer — Maintenance of sewer connections — Combined water and sewer charges — Security deposit — Delinquencies.

In order to protect the public health of persons residing within congested areas, and in order to assure the payment of bonds issued for sewer purposes, the governing body of every city, town and utility district that has issued or, subsequent to March 10, 1955, issues bonds payable in whole or in part from revenues from sewer services provided within or without its borders is authorized by appropriate resolution:

To require the owner, tenant or occupant of each lot or parcel of land that abuts upon a street or other public way containing a sanitary sewer and upon which lot or parcel a building exists for residential, commercial or industrial use, to connect the building with the sanitary sewer and to cease to use any other means for the disposal of sewage, sewage waste or other polluting matter; in addition to any other method of enforcing such requirement, a city, town or utility district also providing water services to such property may, within or without its borders, refuse water service to such owner, tenant or occupant until there has been compliance and may discontinue water service to an owner, tenant or occupant failing to comply within thirty (30) days after notice to comply;

To require the owner, tenant or occupant of each lot or parcel of land who is responsible for any connection to the sanitary sewer required under this section to properly maintain that portion of the connection that is located on the property of the owner, tenant or occupant; and in addition to any other method of enforcing such requirement, a city, town or utility district also providing water service to such property may, within or without its border, refuse water service to such owner, tenant or occupant until there has been compliance and may discontinue water service to an owner, tenant or occupant failing to comply within thirty (30) days after notice to comply;

If any city, town or utility district also operates a water system, and can do so without the impairment of contract rights vested in the holders of any bonds payable from the revenues of such water system, to combine charges for sewer and water services in one (1) statement and to bill the beneficiary of such services for sewer and water services in such manner as to require the payment of both charges as a unit, and to enforce the payment of such charges by discontinuing either the water service or the sewer service, or both;

To require the owner, tenant or occupant of each lot or parcel of land who is obligated to pay the charges made for the services furnished by any sewer system or sewage disposal system, to make a reasonable deposit in advance to ensure the payment of such charges;

To proceed to recover the amount of any delinquent charges owed by any such owner, tenant or occupant, with interest on the delinquent charges at the maximum legal rate, in an action ex contractu; and

To enter into contracts for the collection of such sewer charges with any public or private corporation or municipal utilities board or commission operating a water system, and any public corporation or municipal utilities board or commission is authorized and empowered to make contracts with any other city, town or utility district:

To meter, bill and collect sewer service charges as an added designated item on its water service bills, or otherwise;

To discontinue water service to sewer users who fail or refuse to pay sewer service charges;

Not to accept payment of water service charges from any customer without receiving at the same time payment of any sewer service charges owed by such customer; and

Not to reestablish water service for any customer until such time as all past due sewer service charges owed by such customer have been paid.

Such public corporation or municipal utilities board or commission is hereby authorized to perform all acts and discharge all obligations required by any such contract or contracts.

Acts 1947, ch. 222, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.25 (Williams, § 3340.1); Acts 1955, ch. 144, § 2; 1968, ch. 524, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1403; Acts 1991, ch. 252, § 2.

Cross-References. Requiring connection before improvement, §7-32-120.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Drains and Sewers, § 13.

7-35-202. Action for unpaid sewer or wastewater utility fees or assessments.

In addition to § 7-35-201, upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body, any municipality having a municipal sanitary sewer system may enforce the payment of fees or assessments charged for sewer or wastewater disposal utility services by filing an action in the same manner and with the same penalties and interest attached as provided for the enforcement of unpaid taxes pursuant to title 67, including the sale or execution of such property as provided in title 26, chapter 5, and the redemption provisions of title 66, chapter 8. Such action may be taken only once every calendar year by the municipal sanitary sewer system for unpaid sewer or wastewater utility fees or assessments. The municipal sanitary sewer system shall be required to give notice to the property owner, if different from the service user, not less than ninety (90) days prior to the filing of any action, which would include levying on the real property. Such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the property owner as contained on the tax records of the county where the property is located, and shall include the amount of the unpaid fee or assessment for sewer or wastewater disposal services, together with penalties and interest. The notice shall also contain a statement to the effect that, unless the payments are brought up to date, a lien will attach to the property and an action will be filed pursuant to title 67. The municipal sanitary sewer system shall bear the reasonable costs incurred by a property owner in defending such an action due to an error in the records or fees of the system for the provision of such sewer or wastewater disposal services.

As used in this section, “municipality” means a municipality having a population of:

Not less than eight hundred ninety (890) nor more than nine hundred (900), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Not less than five hundred thirty (530) nor more than five hundred forty (540) that is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand seven hundred one (31,701) nor more than thirty-one thousand eight hundred seven (31,807), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1992, ch. 882, § 1; 2018, ch. 762, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2018, ch. 762, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies only to fees, assessments, and charges that become due and owing on or after April 19, 2018.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b); and deleted “having a population of not less than eight hundred ninety (890) nor more than nine hundred (900), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census,” preceding “any municipality having a municipal sanitary sewer system” in the first sentence of present (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 762, § 3. April 19, 2018.